Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202560-4,132
Purposes of sections.

The purposes of sections 60-462.01, 60-4,133, and 60-4,137 to 60-4,172 are to implement the requirements mandated by the federal Commercial Motor Vehicle Safety Act of 1986, 49 U.S.C. 31100 et seq., the federal Motor Carrier Safety Improvement Act of 1999, Public Law 106-159, 49 U.S.C. 101 et seq., section 1012 of the federal Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001, USA PATRIOT Act, 49 U.S.C. 5103a, and federal regulations as such acts and regulations existed on January 1, 2025, and to reduce or prevent commercial motor vehicle accidents, fatalities, and injuries by: (1) Permitting drivers to hold only one operator's license; (2) disqualifying drivers for specified offenses and serious traffic violations; and (3) strengthening licensing and testing standards.

Laws 1989, LB 285, § 82;

Laws 1993, LB 7, § 2;

Laws 1993, LB 420, § 6;

Laws 2002, LB 499, § 1;

Laws 2003, LB 562, § 8;

Laws 2005, LB 76, § 8;

Laws 2011, LB178, § 7;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 22;

Laws 2018, LB629, § 4;

Laws 2018, LB909, § 88;

Laws 2019, LB79, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB944, § 59;

Laws 2021, LB149, § 12;

Laws 2022, LB750, § 58;

Laws 2023, LB138, § 25;

Laws 2024, LB1200, § 33;

Laws 2025, LB398, § 42.